Missouri, session 2026, SB1725.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 644, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 644.800, to read as
follows:
644.800. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Department", the department of natural resources;
(2) "Discharge", a release by any means including, but
not limited to, spilling, leaking, pumping, pouring,
spraying, emitting, disposing, escaping, emptying, or
dumping, whether intentional or unintentional;
(3) "Perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances" or
"PFAS", any perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances
listed in the toxic chemical list under section 313 of the
Emergency Planning and Community Right-to-Know Act (EPCRA),
as amended;
(4) "Person", the same as defined under section
644.016;
(5) "Waters of the state", the same as defined under
section 644.016.

SB 1725 2
2. The department shall promulgate rules regulating
the manufacture, use, storage, and remediation of
firefighting or fire-suppressing foam to which PFAS have
been intentionally added. Such rules and regulations shall
be designed to protect the environment and ensure safe and
clean soil, water, and air for the state of Missouri.
3. A person that discharges or causes to be discharged
firefighting or fire-suppressing foam to which PFAS have
been intentionally added into or upon any lake, pond, river,
stream, sewer, surface water drainage, groundwater, other
waters of the state, or any public or private water supply
or onto land adjacent to, on, or over such waters shall
report the discharge to the department as soon as
practicable, but no later than twenty-four hours after the
discharge occurs.
4. Beginning January 1, 2028, a person shall not
manufacture, sell, offer for sale, distribute for sale, or
distribute for use in this state a firefighting or fire-
suppressing foam to which PFAS have been intentionally
added, except in the following circumstances:
(1) Such foam is manufactured, sold, or distributed
for use at an airport in the state, so long as the foam is
required by federal law or regulation to be used at airports
for firefighting or fire-suppressing purposes including, but
not limited to, as required by 14 CFR Part 139. The
exception in this subdivision shall not apply if such foam
is not required by federal law or regulation; or
(2) Such foam is manufactured, sold, or distributed
for a marine defense application and the use of the foam is
required by the United States Department of Defense.
5. A person that manufactures for sale or distribution
in this state a firefighting or fire-suppressing foam shall,

SB 1725 3
upon request by the department, provide the department with
a certificate of compliance certifying that the foam does
not contain intentionally added PFAS or is excepted from the
prohibition under subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection 4 of
this section.
6. Except as provided in subsection 4 of this section,
before January 1, 2028, a person that manufactures
firefighting or fire-suppressing foam to which PFAS have
been intentionally added and sold, offered for sale, or
distributed in this state before January 1, 2028, shall:
(1) Provide written notification regarding the
prohibition to any person in the state that received such
foam from the manufacturer for sale, distribution, or use;
and
(2) Issue a recall of all such foam, which shall
include a process by which a person in the state that
received such foam will be reimbursed by the manufacturer
for the recalled foam.
7. The director may promulgate all necessary rules and
regulations for the administration of this section. Any
rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in
section 536.010, that is created under the authority
delegated in this section shall become effective only if it
complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of
chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This
section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the
powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter
536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove
and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional,
then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed
or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✓